Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1835
Victim's Compensation Fund; created; use; investment.

The Victim's Compensation Fund is created. The fund may be used for operating costs associated with administering the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, awards or judgments under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act other than distributions from the Community Trust, violence prevention, and not more than four hundred thousand dollars for costs and expenses described in subsection (1) of section 81-1429.03. The fund shall include deposits pursuant to sections 29-2286, 33-157, 81-1836, 83-183.01, and 83-184 and donations or contributions from public or private sources and shall be in such amount as the Legislature shall determine to be reasonably sufficient to meet anticipated claims. When the amount of money in the fund is not sufficient to pay any awards or judgments under the act or invoices under the Sexual Assault Payment Program, the Director of Administrative Services shall immediately advise the Legislature and request an emergency appropriation to satisfy such awards, judgments, and invoices. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 35;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 33;

Laws 1987, LB 353, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 132;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 14;

Laws 2010, LB510, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 207.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.